Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-15,126
Policies and procedures; standards.

A local housing agency shall not apply its policies, rules, procedures, criteria, requirements, and exclusions with respect to eligibility of applicants, granting assistance, or enforcing standards relating to occupancy or continuance of assistance in an arbitrary or capricious manner.

Laws 1999, LB 105, § 55.